District of Columbia statutes.
29A-806

Repealed

Name of corporation.

Repealed.

Mar. 3, 1901, 31 Stat. 1284, ch. 854, § 604
June 30, 1902, 32 Stat. 533, ch. 1329
July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 3(k)(7), 58 DCR 1720
1973 Ed., § 29-606.
1981 Ed., § 29-1006.
2001 Ed., § 29-806.